North Carolina statutes. Chapter 143D. The State Governmental Accountability and Internal Control Act.
Article 3. Accountability.

§ 143D-11.
Violations.

The State Controller, in consultation with the State Auditor, shall establish a mechanism to allow for the reporting and investigation of violations of the provisions of this Chapter. This mechanism shall encourage all State employees to become familiar with the provisions of this Chapter and to report any known violations.

History.

2007-520, s. 1.

§ 143D-12.
Penalties.

A willful or continued failure of an employee paid from State funds or employed by a State agency to adhere to the requirements of this Chapter is sufficient cause for disciplinary action, up to and including dismissal of the employee.

History.

2007-520, s. 1.